hu: Játékvariáció: Asztali mini; Speedball; Pányvás foci; Köteles tenisz; Pányvás labda; Egyéb
vi: Biến thể trò chơi: Cỡ nhỏ để bàn; Speedball; Bóng đá cột dây; Tennis cột dây; Bóng cột dây; Khác
zh-TW: 遊戲玩法類型: 桌面迷你; 高速球; 繫繩足球; 繫繩網球; 繫繩球; 其他
el: Παραλλαγή παιχνιδιού: Επιτραπέζιο μίνι; Speedball; Ποδόσφαιρο με σχοινί; Τένις με σχοινί; Tetherball; Άλλο
en: Game variation: Desktop mini; Speedball; Tether soccer; Tether tennis; Tetherball; Other
hr-HR: Varijacija igre: Stolni mini; Speedball; Nogomet na užetu; Tenis na užetu; Tetherball; Ostalo
pt-PT: Variação do jogo: Miniatura de mesa; Speedball; Futebol em poste; Ténis em poste; Bola no poste; Outra
fr: Variante de jeu: Mini de bureau; Speedball; Football captif; Tennis captif; Ballon captif; Autre
fi: Pelivariaatio: Pöytämini; Speedball; Narujalkapallo; Narutennis; Tetherball; Muu
da: Spilvariation: Bordmodel (mini); Speedball; Stangfodbold; Stangtennis; Tetherball; Andet
ro-RO: Variație de joc: Desktop mini; Speedball; Fotbal cu minge legată; Tenis cu minge legată; Tetherball; Altele
th: รูปแบบเกม: มินิเดสก์ท็อป; สปีดบอล; เทเธอร์ซอกเกอร์; เทเธอร์เทนนิส; เทเธอร์บอล; อื่นๆ
ko: 게임 변형 종류: 데스크톱 미니; 스피드볼; 테더 사커; 테더 테니스; 테더볼; 기타
pt-BR: Variação do jogo: Mini de mesa; Speedball; Futebol de mastro; Tênis de mastro; Espiribol; Outro
nl: Spelvariant: Tafelmodel mini; Speedball; Tether soccer; Paaltennis; Tetherball; Overig
sv: Spelvariant: Mini för skrivbord; Speedball; Stångfotboll; Stångtennis; Tetherball; Övrigt
ja: ゲームの種類: デスクトップミニ; スピードボール; テザーサッカー; テザーテニス; テザーボール; その他
bg-BG: Вариант на играта: Настолна мини; Спийдбол; Футбол на стълб; Тенис на стълб; Тедърбол; Друго
it: Variante del gioco: Mini da tavolo; Speedball; Tether soccer; Tether tennis; Tetherball; Altro
sk-SK: Variácia hry: Stolové mini; Speedball; Tether soccer; Tether tennis; Tetherball; Iné
tr: Oyun çeşidi: Masaüstü mini; Speedball; İpli futbol; İpli tenis; Tetherball; Diğer
pl: Wariacja gry: Miniaturowa na biurko; Speedball; Piłka nożna na uwięzi; Tenis na uwięzi; Tetherball; Inna
nb: Spillvariant: Bordmodell mini; Speedball; Fotball i snor; Stangtennis; Stangball; Annet
de: Spielvariante: Desktop-Mini; Speedball; Tether-Soccer; Tether-Tennis; Tetherball; Sonstige
es: Variación del juego: Mini de escritorio; Speedball; Fútbol con cuerda; Tenis con cuerda; Tetherball; Otra
lt-LT: Žaidimo variantas: Stalinis mini; Spydbolas; Pririštas futbolo kamuolys; Pririštas teniso kamuolys; Teterbolas; Kita
cs: Varianta hry: Stolní mini; Speedball; Tether soccer; Tether tennis; Tetherball; Ostatní
zh-CN: 游戏变体: 桌面迷你; 极速球 (Speedball); 拴球足球 (Tether soccer); 拴球网球 (Tether tennis); 拴球 (Tetherball); 其他
sl-SI: Različica igre: Mini za na mizo; Speedball; Nogomet na vrvi; Tenis na vrvi; Tetherball; Drugo
ru: Вариант игры: Настольная мини-версия; Спидбол; [Футбол на привязи, Футбол на привязи, Футбол на привязи]; Теннис на привязи; Тетербол; Другое